Washington statutes.
RCW 43.155.068

Loans or grants for preconstruction activities.

(1) The board may make loans or grants to local governments for preconstruction activities on public works projects before the legislature approves the construction phase of the project. Preconstruction activities include design, engineering, bid-document preparation, environmental studies, right-of-way acquisition, value planning, and other preliminary phases of public works projects as determined by the board. The purpose of the loans and grants authorized in this section is to accelerate the completion of public works projects by allowing preconstruction activities to be performed before the appropriation for the construction phase of the project by the legislature.

(2) Projects receiving loans or grants for preconstruction activities under this section must be evaluated using the priority process and factors in RCW 43.155.070. The receipt of a loan or grant for preconstruction activities does not ensure the receipt of a construction loan or grant for the project under this chapter. Construction loans or grants for projects receiving a loan or grant for preconstruction activities under this section are subject to legislative appropriation under RCW 43.155.070(7). The board shall adopt a single application process for local governments seeking both a loan or grant for preconstruction activities under this section and a construction loan for the project.

[ 2017 3rd sp.s. c 10 s 8; 2001 c 131 s 4; 1995 c 363 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Purpose—1995 c 363: "The legislature finds that there continues to exist a great need for capital projects to plan, acquire, design, construct, and repair local government streets, roads, bridges, water systems, and storm and sanitary sewage systems. It is the purpose of this act to accelerate the construction of these projects under the public works assistance program." [ 1995 c 363 s 1.]